North Carolina, session 2025, HB539.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 159-13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 159-13. The budget ordinance; form, adoption, limitations, tax levy, filing.
…
(c) The budget ordinance of a local government shall levy taxes on property at rates that
will produce the revenue necessary to balance appropriations and revenues, after taking into
account the estimated percentage of the levy that will not be collected during the fiscal year. The
budget ordinance of a public authority shall be balanced so that appropriations do not exceed
revenues.
(c1) For every year in which a general reappraisal of real property has been conducted in
a local government, the budget ordinance of that local government shall levy taxes on property
for that year at the revenue-neutral tax rate set out in G.S. 159-11(e).
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to budget
ordinances passed on or after that date.
*H539-v-1*